Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-107
Class of subscribers, defined.

Class of subscribers means a group of customers for which a telecommunications company has established a distinct pricing plan for telecommunications service.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 8.